Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 11. Foreign Limited Liability Partnership.

§79-13-1101.
Law governing foreign limited liability partnership.

The law under which a foreign limited liability partnership is formed governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership and the liability of partners for obligations of the partnership.

A foreign limited liability partnership may not be denied a statement of foreign qualification by reason of any difference between the law under which the partnership was formed and the law of this state.

A statement of foreign qualification does not authorize a foreign limited liability partnership to engage in any business or exercise any power that a partnership may not engage in or exercise in this state as a limited liability partnership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1101, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-1102.
Statement of foreign qualification.

Before transacting business in this state, a foreign limited liability partnership must file a statement of foreign qualification. The statement must contain:

The name of the foreign limited liability partnership which satisfies the requirements of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it is formed and ends with “Registered Limited Liability Partnership,” “Limited Liability Partnership,” “R.L.L.P.,” “L.L.P.,” “RLLP” or “LLP”;

The street address of the partnership’s chief executive office;

The information required by Section 79-35-5(a); and

A deferred effective date, if any.

[Reserved]

The status of a partnership as a foreign limited liability partnership is effective on the later of the filing of the statement of foreign qualification or a date specified in the statement. The status remains effective, regardless of changes in the partnership, until it is canceled pursuant to Section 79-13-105(d).

An amendment or cancellation of a statement of foreign qualification is effective when it is filed or on a deferred effective date specified in the amendment or cancellation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1102; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 81, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted “and, if different, the street address of an office of the partnership in this state, if any” from the end of (a)(2); rewrote (a)(3), which formerly read: “If there is no office of the partnership in this state, the name and street address of the partnership’s agent for service of process”; and deleted (b), which read: “The agent of a foreign limited liability company for service of process must be an individual who is a resident of this state or other person authorized to do business in this state” and reserved the subsection designator.

Execution, filing and recording of statements, see § 79-13-105.

Filing fees, see § 79-13-105.

§79-13-1103.
Effect of failure to qualify.

A foreign limited liability partnership transacting business in this state may not maintain an action or proceeding in this state unless it has in effect a statement of foreign qualification.

The failure of a foreign limited liability partnership to have in effect a statement of foreign qualification does not impair the validity of a contract or act of the foreign limited liability partnership or preclude it from defending an action or proceeding in this state.

A limitation on personal liability of a partner is not waived solely by transacting business in this state without a statement of foreign qualification.

If a foreign limited liability partnership transacts business in this state without a statement of foreign qualification, the Secretary of State is its agent for service of process with respect to a right of action arising out of the transaction of business in this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1103, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-1104.
Activities not constituting transacting business.

Activities of a foreign limited liability partnership which do not constitute transacting business for the purpose of this article include:

Maintaining, defending, or settling an action or proceeding;

Holding meetings of its partners or carrying on any other activity concerning its internal affairs;

Maintaining bank accounts;

Maintaining offices or agencies for the transfer, exchange, and registration of the partnership’s own securities or maintaining trustees or depositories with respect to those securities;

Selling through independent contractors;

Soliciting or obtaining orders, whether by mail or through employees or agents or otherwise, if the orders require acceptance outside this state before they become contracts;

Creating or acquiring indebtedness, with or without a mortgage, or other security interest in property;

Collecting debts or foreclosing mortgages or other security interests in property securing the debts, and holding, protecting, and maintaining property so acquired;

Conducting an isolated transaction that is completed within thirty (30) days and is not one in the course of similar transactions; and

Transacting business in interstate commerce.

For purposes of this article, the ownership in this state of income-producing real property or tangible personal property, other than property excluded under subsection (a), constitutes transacting business in this state.

This section does not apply in determining the contacts or activities that may subject a foreign limited liability partnership to service of process, taxation, or regulation under any other law of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1104, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-1105.
Action by attorney general.

The Attorney General may maintain an action to restrain a foreign limited liability partnership from transacting business in this state in violation of this article.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 1105, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-1106.
Administrative revocation of statement of foreign qualification; grounds.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under Section 79-13-1107 to revoke the statement of foreign qualification of a foreign limited liability partnership authorized to transact business in this state if:

[Reserved]

The foreign limited liability partnership does not pay within sixty (60) days after they are due any fees, taxes, or penalties imposed by this chapter or other law;

The foreign limited partnership is without a registered agent in this state for sixty (60) days or more;

The foreign limited liability partnership does not notify the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days that its registered agent has been changed or that its registered agent has resigned;

The Secretary of State receives a duly authenticated certificate from the Secretary of State or other public official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law the foreign limited liability partnership is organized stating that it has been dissolved or disappeared as the result of a merger; or

A misrepresentation has been made of any material matter in any application, report, affidavit, or other record submitted by the foreign limited liability partnership pursuant to this chapter.

The Secretary of State may not revoke a statement of foreign qualification of a foreign limited liability partnership unless the Secretary of State sends the foreign limited liability partnership notice of the revocation at least sixty (60) days before its effective date, by a record addressed to its registered agent, or to the foreign limited liability partnership if the foreign limited liability partnership fails to appoint and maintain a proper agent in this state. The notice must specify the cause for the revocation of the registration. The authority of the foreign limited liability partnership to transact business in this state ceases on the effective date of the revocation unless the foreign limited liability partnership cures the failure before that date.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 82; Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment substituted “Section 79-13-1107” for “Section 79-14-1107” in the introductory paragraph of (a); substituted “foreign limited liability partnership” for “limited partnership” in (a)(4); and inserted “foreign” preceding “limited liability partnership” in (a)(6) and in the second, third, fourth and fifth time it appears in (b).

§79-13-1107.
Administrative revocation of statement of foreign qualification; procedure.

If the Secretary of State determines that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-13-1106 for revocation of a statement of foreign qualification, he shall serve the foreign limited liability partnership with written notice of his determination, except that such determination may be served by first-class mail.

If the foreign limited liability partnership does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State that each ground determined by the Secretary of State does not exist within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected, the Secretary of State may revoke the foreign limited liability partnership’s statement of foreign qualification by signing a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the foreign limited liability partnership, except that such certificate may be served by first-class mail.

The authority of a foreign limited liability partnership to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate revoking its registration.

The Secretary of State’s revocation of a foreign limited liability partnership’s registration appoints the Secretary of State the foreign limited liability partnership’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action which arose during the time the foreign limited liability partnership was authorized to transact business in this state. Service of process on the Secretary of State under this subsection is service on the foreign limited liability partnership. Upon receipt of process, the Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the process to the foreign limited liability partnership at its principal office shown in its most recent communication received from the foreign limited liability partnership stating the current mailing address of its principal office, or, if none are on file, in its application for a registration.

Revocation of a foreign limited liability partnership’s statement of foreign qualification does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the foreign limited liability partnership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 83; Laws, 2015, ch. 453, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment substituted “Section 79-13-1106” for “Section 79-14-1106” in (a); and inserted “foreign” preceding “limited liability partnership” in (e).

§79-13-1108.
Administrative revocation of statement of foreign qualification; reinstatement.

A foreign limited liability partnership whose statement of foreign qualification is administratively revoked under Section 79-13-1107 may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatementat any time after the effective date of such revocation. The application must:

Recite the name of the limited liability partnership and the effective date of the administrative revocation;

State that the ground or grounds for revocation either did not exist or have been eliminated;

State that the limited liability partnership’s name satisfies the requirements of Section 79-13-1002; and

Contain a certificate from the Mississippi Department of Revenue reciting that the limited liability partnership has properly filed all reports and paid all taxes and penalties required by revenue laws of this state.

If the Secretary of State determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section and that the information is correct, he shall reinstate the registration, prepare a certificate that recites his determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and serve a copy on the limited liability partnership.

When the reinstatement is effective:

The reinstatement relates back to and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative revocation;

Any liability incurred by a member after the administrative revocation and before the reinstatement shall be determined as if the administrative revocation had never occurred; and

The limited liability partnership may resume its business as if the administrative revocation had never occurred.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 84, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

§79-13-1109.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement.

If the Secretary of State denies a foreign limited liability partnership’s application for reinstatement of the statement of foreign qualification following administrative revocation, he shall serve the limited liability partnership with a written communication that explains the reason or reasons for denial.

The limited liability partnership may appeal the denial of reinstatement to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County or the chancery court of the county where the limited liability partnership is domiciled within thirty (30) days after service of the communication of denial is perfected. The limited liability partnership appeals by petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of the Secretary of State’s communication of denial.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the registration of the limited liability partnership or may take other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 85, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.